Hawaii statutes.
[§445-95.2] Unfair and deceptive practices
defined. The following are defined as unfair or deceptive practices in the
rooming house business:

(1) Requiring, seeking, or encouraging any resident
or prospective resident to execute a power of attorney in which the resident or
prospective resident names the rooming house, its owner, or any of its agents
or employees as attorney-in-fact;

(2) Making any representation that the rooming house
offers medical care, rehabilitation, or therapeutic benefits of any type;

(3) Negotiating public assistance checks payable to a
resident;

(4) Refusing to refund any deposit as provided in
sections 521-44(c) and 521-66;

(5) Refusing to give any resident a partial rent
refund in accordance with section 521-66;

(6) Encouraging, soliciting, or requiring any
resident or prospective resident to consent to the release of information
concerning the resident or prospective resident which is maintained by any
government agency and otherwise confidential;

(7) Encouraging, soliciting, or requiring a resident
or prospective resident to:

(A) Turn over food stamps to the rooming
house, its agents, or employees; or

(B) Permit authorization to purchase (ATP)
food stamp cards to be negotiated by the rooming house, its agents, or employees;

(8) Limiting, hindering, or restricting access of
residents who are food stamp recipients to foodstuffs, food containers,
refrigerators, or other food storage facilities;

(9) Encouraging, soliciting, or requiring any
resident or prospective resident to apply for or receive food stamps if the
rooming house has meal service;

(10) Accepting food stamps as payment for or in
reduction of rent;

(11) Charging different rents for similar
accommodations based on the amount of a resident's public assistance benefits;

(12) Encouraging, soliciting, or requiring any
resident or prospective resident to have public assistance benefits mailed to
the rooming house, its owner, or its agents or employees; and

(13) Denying any prospective resident or evicting any
resident from living accommodations solely on the basis of age or disability.
[L 1988, c 313, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next